Illinois, session 104th, HB410.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Violent Crime Witness Protection Act is 5amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (725 ILCS 173/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Violent Crime Witness Protection Act.9(Source: P.A. 102-756, eff. 5-10-22.)